Hawaii statutes.
§381-2 Duty to avoid lockouts and strikes
by collective bargaining. In order to avoid any interruption of public
utility service to users, consumers, or the public, any public utility and its
employees and their respective representatives shall use the processes of
conference and collective bargaining in the settlement of all disputes between
the public utility and the employees thereof, without resort to lockout or
strike. [L 1949, c 146, pt of §1; RL 1955, §91-3; HRS §381-2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next